Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1676
Jury list; tampering; solicitation; penalty.

If any person places a name or asks to have a name placed on any list of potential jurors for service on any grand or petit jury in a manner not authorized by the Jury Selection Act, such person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 6, p. 570;

C.S.1922, § 1900;

C.S.1929, § 20-1630;

Laws 1939, c. 18, § 15, p. 107;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1630;

R.S.1943, § 25-1630;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 101;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1630;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 33.